Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
325

INFECTIOUS
AND COMMUNICABLE DISEASES

Part I. General Provisions

Section

325-1 Diseases or conditions declared
communicable

or dangerous to public health

325-1.5 Purpose

325-2 Physicians, laboratory directors, and

health care professionals to report

325-2.5 Health care-associated infection reporting

325-3 Others to report

325-4 Identity of patients safeguarded

325-5 Antitoxins, antiserums, vaccines,
biologics,

and drugs

325-6 Epidemic control

325-7 Repealed

325-8 Infected persons and quarantine

325-9 Quarantine without removal; duty of police

officers to assist in removals and
enforcement

of quarantine

325-10, 11 Repealed

325-12 Common drinking cup prohibited

325-13 Rules

325-14 Penalty

325-15 Infectious and communicable diseases,

examination and treatment

325-16 Informed consent for testing or disclosure

325-16.5 Counseling and testing of sexual assault
victims;

testing of sex offenders upon request of
victim

325-17 Quality assurance standards for HIV
antibody testing

325-18 Advisory committees for health care
workers infected

with blood-borne infections

325-19 Rubella testing of pregnant women

325-20 Agreements; collaborative assistance in
control of

disease outbreaks

325-21 Sale of sterile syringes for the
prevention of disease

Part II. Vaccination and Immunization

325-31 Repealed

325-32 Immunization against infectious diseases

325-33 Performance of vaccination and
immunization

325-34 Exemptions

325-35 Forms and procedures

325-36 Duty of adult, or of parent, guardian, or
caregiver

325-37 Fraud; wilful misrepresentation; failure
to

comply; penalties

325-38 Immunization of indigent, medically
indigent, and

other persons

Part III. Congenital Syphilis

325-51 Blood samples of pregnant women required

325-52 Serologic tests; reports

325-53 Reports of blood tests

325-54 Reports confidential; penalty

325-55 Rules and regulations

325-56 Penalty

Part IV. Tuberculosis

325-71 Reports by physicians and others

325-72 Examination of sputum

325-73 Protection of record; penalty

325-74 Physicians; precautions; instructions

325-75 Reporting recovery of patient

325-76 Examinations for tuberculosis

325-77 Notice

325-78 Test and treatment for tuberculosis

325-79 to 84 Repealed

Part V. Hepatitis

325-91 Blood transfusion; hepatitis

325-92 Prenatal hepatitis B screening and
treatment of

newborns

Part VI. HIV Infection, ARC, and AIDS

325-101 Confidentiality of records and information

325-102 Civil penalty

325-103 Custodian of records

325-104 Responsibility to report

Part VII. Needle Exchange Program

325-111 Definitions

325-112 Sterile needle and syringe exchange
program

established

325-113 Operation of the program

325-114 Criminal liability

325-115 Program oversight committee

325-116 Reports

325-117 Termination of the program

Part VIII. Immunization Registry

325-121 Definitions

325-122 Hawaii immunization registry;
establishment

and purposes

325-123 Confidentiality and content of registry
records

325-124 Purposes for access to registry
information;

access not a disclosure

325-125 Registry record requirements; duration of
retention

325-126 Civil and criminal liability

Part VIII. Immunization Registry

325-121 Definitions

325-123 Confidentiality and content of registry
records

325-124 Purposes for access to registry
information; access

not a disclosure

325-125 Registry record requirements; duration of
retention

Cross References

Management and disposal of infectious wastes, see §321-21.

Vaccinations for children by pharmacist, see §461-11.4.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next